Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6843
Infrastructure development loan; application; approval; factors considered.

(1) A taxpayer with an application under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act may apply for an infrastructure development loan by submitting an application to the Department of Economic Development which includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The nature of the business and the type and number of jobs to be created or retained;

(b) The estimated wage levels of the jobs to be created or retained; and

(c) A brief description of the infrastructure need that the loan is intended to fill.

(2) The director shall determine whether to approve the taxpayer's application for an infrastructure development loan under the ImagiNE Nebraska Act based upon the director's determination as to whether the loan will help enable the state to accomplish the purposes stated in section 77-6841. The director shall be governed by and shall take into consideration all of the following factors in making such determination:

(a) The department's comprehensive business development strategy;

(b) The necessity of the loan to assure that the applicant will expand employment in Nebraska;

(c) The number of jobs to be created; and

(d) The expected pay of the jobs to be created.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 43.